Hawaii statutes.
[§707-787] Unlawful conduct with
respect to documents. (1) A person commits unlawful conduct with respect
to documents if the person knowingly:

(a) Destroys, conceals, removes, confiscates, or
possesses any actual or purported government identification document of another
person:

(i) In the course of a violation or attempt
to commit an offense under section 707-781 or 707-782; or

(ii) To prevent or restrict, or in an attempt
to prevent or restrict, without lawful authority, the ability of the other
person to move or travel in order to maintain the labor or services of the
other person, when the person is or has been the victim of an offense under section
707-781 or 707-782; or

(b) Destroys, conceals, removes, or confiscates any
actual or purported government identification document of an employee.

(2) Unlawful conduct with respect to documents
is a class C felony. [L 2011, c 146, pt of §1]

COMMENTARY ON §§707-780 TO 707-787

Act 146, Session Laws 2011, established, among other things,
a class A and class B felony offense for labor trafficking, an offense for
nonpayment of wages, and an offense for unlawful conduct with respect to
documents. The legislature found that Hawaii is one of only five states
without a specific labor trafficking statute, yet labor trafficking has
occurred at an unprecedented level in the State. Act 146 sent an unmistakable
warning to individuals and entities engaged in labor trafficking and provided a
clearer and more structured means for law enforcement agencies to protect and
aid trafficking victims. Also, Act 146 would be a catalyst for law enforcement
agencies, service providers, and other state agencies and community
organizations to engage in needed training and education on labor trafficking.
Conference Committee Report No. 77.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next